Utah statutes.
34-46-301.   Investigations -- Complaints -- Sanctions -- Rulemaking.
(1)  The division may investigate an alleged violation of this chapter.
(2) (a)  An individual claiming to be aggrieved by an action of an employer in
violation of this chapter may file with the division a request for agency
action.
(b)  On receipt of a request for agency action under Subsection (2)(a), the
division:
(i)  shall conduct an adjudicative proceeding pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter
4, Administrative Procedures Act; and
(ii)  may attempt to reach a settlement between the parties through a
settlement conference.
(3) (a)  If the division determines that a violation has occurred, the
division may order that the employer:
(i)  cease and desist the action;
(ii)  pay a fine to the division of up to $500 for a violation, regardless of
the number of applicant's affected by the violation; or
(iii)  comply with a combination of Subsections (3)(a)(i) and (ii).
(b)  Monies received under this section shall be deposited as a dedicated
credit to the division to pay for the costs of administering this chapter.
(4)  The commission may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, regarding:
(a)  the process to file a written complaint with the division; and
(b)  the terms defined in Section 34-46-102.
